Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6318.01
Act; purpose and applicability.

(1) The Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act contains procedures and requirements for the accreditation of training programs, procedures and requirements for the licensure of individuals and firms engaged in lead-based paint activities, and work practice standards for performing lead-based paint activities. The act also requires that, except as otherwise provided in the act, all lead-based paint activities be performed by licensed individuals and firms.

(2) The act applies to all individuals and firms who are engaged in lead-based paint activities, except persons who perform lead-based paint activities within residential dwellings that they own, unless the residential dwelling is occupied by a person or persons other than the owner or the owner's immediate family while these activities are being performed or unless a child residing in the building has been identified as having an elevated blood-lead level.

(3) While the act establishes specific requirements for performing lead-based paint activities should they be undertaken, nothing in the act requires that the owner or occupant undertake any particular lead-based paint activity.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1261.